Washington statutes.
RCW 24.55.065

Application to existing institutional funds.

(1) Before July 1, 2009, this chapter applies to an institutional fund existing on May 11, 2009, only if the institution's governing body elects to apply this chapter to the institutional fund before July 1, 2009.

(2) On and after July 1, 2009, this chapter applies to all institutional funds.

(3) As applied to institutional funds existing on May 11, 2009, this chapter governs only decisions made or actions taken on or after July 1, 2009, except that in the case of an institution that makes the election under subsection (1) of this section this chapter governs decisions made or actions taken on or after the date the institution elects to be covered by this chapter.

[ 2009 c 436 s 8.]